California statutes. Probate Code
(4) The estate is solvent.

(b) Nothing in this section limits application of (1) the doctrines of waiver, estoppel, laches, or detrimental reliance or (2) any other equitable principle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Claims by Public Entities [9200. - 9205.]

9200.

(a) Except as provided in this chapter, a claim by a public entity shall be filed within the time otherwise provided in this part. A claim not so filed is barred, including any lien imposed for the claim.

(b) As used in this chapter, “public entity” has the meaning provided in Section 811.2 of the Government Code, and includes an officer authorized to act on behalf of the public entity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9201.

(a) Notwithstanding any other statute, if a claim of a public entity arises under a law, act, or code listed in subdivision (b):

(1) The public entity may provide a form to be used for the written notice or request to the public entity required by this chapter. Where appropriate, the form may require the decedent’s social security number, if known.

(2) The claim is barred only after written notice or request to the public entity and expiration of the period provided in the applicable section. If no written notice or request is made, the claim is enforceable by the remedies, and is barred at the time, otherwise provided in the law, act, or code.

(b) Law, Act, or CodeApplicable SectionSales and Use Tax Law (com-
mencing with Section 6001 of
the Revenue and Taxation
Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue
and Taxation CodeBradley-Burns Uniform Local
Sales and Use Tax Law (com-
mencing with Section 7200 of
the Revenue and Taxation
Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue
and Taxation
 CodeTransactions and Use Tax Law
(commencing with Section 7251
of the Revenue and Taxation
Code)Section 6487.1 of the Revenue
and Taxation CodeMotor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law
(commencing with Section
7301 of the Revenue and Taxa-
tion Code)Section 7675.1 of the Revenue
and Taxation CodeUse Fuel Tax Law (commencing
with Section 8601 of the Reve-
nue and Taxation Code)Section 8782.1 of the Revenue and Taxation CodeAdministration of Franchise and
Income Tax Law (commencing
with Section 18401 of the
 Reve-
nue and Taxation Code)Section 19517 of the Revenue
and Taxation CodeCigarette Tax Law (commenc-
ing with Section 30001 of the
Revenue and Taxation Code)Section 30207.1 of the Reve-
nue and Taxation CodeAlcoholic Beverage Tax Law
(commencing with Section
32001 of the Revenue and Taxa-
tion Code)Section 32272.1 of the Reve-
nue and Taxation CodeUnemployment Insurance CodeSection 1090 of the Unemploy-
ment Insurance CodeState Hospitals
 (commencing
 with
Section 7200 of the Welfare and
Institutions Code)Section 7277.1 of the Welfare
and Institutions CodeMedi-Cal Act (commencing
with Section 14000 of the Wel-
fare and Institutions Code)Section 9202 of the Probate
CodeWaxman-Duffy Prepaid Health
Plan Act (commencing with Sec-
tion 14200 of the Welfare and
Institutions Code)Section 9202 of the Probate
Code

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 49.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

(a) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Director of the State Department of Health Care Services notice of the decedent’s death in the manner provided in Section 215, or submitted electronically to the director through the department’s official internet website using the online notice of death form, if the general personal representative knows or has reason to believe that the decedent received health care under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or was the surviving spouse of a person who received that health care. The director has four months after notice is given in which to file a
 claim.

(b) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Director of the California Victim Compensation Board notice of the decedent’s death in the manner provided in Section 216 if the general personal representative or estate attorney knows that an heir or beneficiary is or has previously been confined in a prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or confined in any county or city jail, road camp, industrial farm, or other local correctional facility. The director of the board shall have four months after that notice is received in which to pursue collection of any outstanding restitution fines or orders.

(c) (1) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a
 general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give the Franchise Tax Board notice of the administration of the estate. The notice shall be given as provided in Section 1215.

(2) The provisions of this subdivision shall apply to estates for which letters are first issued on or after July 1, 2008.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as requiring the estate attorney, the beneficiary, the personal representative, or the person in possession of property of the decedent to conduct an additional investigation to determine whether a decedent has an heir or beneficiary who has been confined in a prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or its Division of Juvenile Facilities, or confined in any county or city jail, road camp, industrial farm, or other local correctional
 facility.

(e) (1) Not later than 90 days after the date letters are first issued to a general personal representative, the general personal representative or estate attorney shall give notice of the decedent’s death to the Director of the California Department of Child Support Services, in the manner provided by Section 1215, or submitted electronically to the director through the department’s official internet website in a manner to be determined by the department, if the general personal representative or estate attorney knows or has reason to believe that the decedent had a child support obligation under an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) A local child support agency providing services pursuant to Division 17 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Family Code may assert a claim no later than four months after receiving notice under
 this subdivision.

(3) This subdivision applies to estates for which letters are first issued on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 200, Sec. 26.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

(a) Failure of a person to give the written notice or request required by this chapter does not affect the validity of any proceeding under this code concerning the administration of the decedent’s estate.

(b) If property in the estate is distributed before expiration of the time allowed a public entity to file a claim, the public entity has a claim against the distributees to the full extent of the public entity’s claim, or each distributee’s share of the distributed property,
 whichever is less. The public entity’s claim against distributees includes interest at a rate equal to that specified in Section 19521 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, from the date of distribution or the date of filing the claim by the public entity, whichever is later, plus other accruing costs as in the case of enforcement of a money judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the order of priority of claims provided for under other provisions of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

This chapter does not apply to liability for the restitution of amounts illegally acquired through the means of a fraudulent, false, or incorrect representation, or a forged or unauthorized endorsement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Allowance and Rejection of Claims [9250. - 9256.]

9250.

(a) When a claim is filed, the personal representative shall allow or reject the claim in whole or in part.

(b) The allowance or rejection shall be in writing. The personal representative shall file the allowance or rejection with the court clerk and give notice to the creditor as provided in Part 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 3, together with a copy of the allowance or rejection.

(c) The allowance or rejection shall contain the following information:

(1) The name of the creditor.

(2) The total amount of the claim.

(3) The date of issuance of letters.

(4) The date of the decedent’s death.

(5) The estimated value of the decedent’s estate.

(6) The amount allowed or rejected by the personal representative.

(7) Whether the personal representative is authorized to act under the Independent Administration of Estates Act (Part 6 (commencing with Section 10400)).

(8) A statement that the creditor has 90 days in which to act on a rejected claim.

(d) The Judicial Council may prescribe an allowance or rejection form, which may be part of the claim form. Use of a form prescribed by the Judicial Council is deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(e) This section does not apply to a demand the personal representative elects to treat as a claim under Section 9154.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9251.

If the personal representative is not authorized to act under the Independent Administration of Estates Act (Part 6 (commencing with Section 10400)):

(a) Immediately on the filing of the allowance of a claim, the clerk shall present the claim and allowance to the court or judge for approval or rejection.

(b) On presentation of a claim and allowance, the court or judge may, in its discretion, examine the creditor and others on oath and receive any evidence relevant to the validity of the claim. The court or judge shall endorse on the claim whether the claim is approved or rejected and the date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

(a) If the personal representative or the attorney for the personal representative is a creditor of the decedent, the clerk shall present the claim to the court or judge for approval or rejection. The court or judge may in its discretion require the creditor to file a petition and give notice of hearing.

(b) If the court or judge approves the claim, the claim is established and shall be included with other established claims to be paid in the course of administration.

(c) If the court or judge rejects the claim, the personal representative or attorney may bring an action against the estate. Summons shall be served on the judge, who shall appoint an attorney at the expense of the estate to defend the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.

A claim barred by the statute of limitations may not be allowed by the personal representative or approved by the court or judge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

(a) The validity of an allowed or approved claim may be contested by any interested person at any time before settlement of the report or account of the personal representative in which it is first reported as an allowed or approved claim. The burden of proof is on the contestant, except where the personal representative has acted under the Independent Administration of Estates Act (Part 6 (commencing Section 10400)), in which case the burden of proof is on the personal representative.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a claim established by a judgment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

(a) The personal representative may allow a claim, or the court or judge may approve a claim, in part. The allowance or approval shall state the amount for which the claim is allowed or approved.

(b) A creditor who refuses to accept the amount allowed or approved in satisfaction of the claim may bring an action on the claim in the manner provided in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 9350). The creditor may not recover costs in the action unless the creditor recovers an amount greater than that allowed or approved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9256.

If within 30 days after a claim is filed the personal representative or the court or judge has refused or neglected to act on the claim, the refusal or neglect may, at the option of the creditor, be deemed equivalent to giving a notice of rejection on the 30th day.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Claims Established by Judgment [9300. - 9304.]

9300.

(a) Except as provided in Section 9303, after the death of the decedent all money judgments against the decedent or against the personal representative on a claim against the decedent or estate are payable in the course of administration and are not enforceable against property in the estate of the decedent under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure).

(b) Subject to Section 9301, a judgment referred to in subdivision (a) shall be filed in the same manner as other claims.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.

When a money judgment against a personal representative in a representative capacity becomes final, it conclusively establishes the validity of the claim for the amount of the judgment. The judgment shall provide that it is payable out of property in the decedent’s estate in the course of administration. An abstract of the judgment shall be filed in the administration proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

(a) Notwithstanding the death of the decedent, a judgment for possession of property or a judgment for sale of property may be enforced under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure). Nothing in this subdivision authorizes enforcement under the Enforcement of Judgments Law against any property in the estate of the decedent other than the property described in the judgment for possession or sale.

(b) After the death of the decedent, a demand for money that is not satisfied from the property described in a judgment for sale of property shall be filed as a claim in the same manner as other claims and is payable in the course of administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

If property of the decedent is subject to an execution lien at the time of the decedent’s death, enforcement against the property may proceed under the Enforcement of Judgments Law (Title 9 (commencing with Section 680.010) of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure) to satisfy the judgment. The levying officer shall account to the personal representative for any surplus. If the judgment is not satisfied, the balance of the judgment remaining unsatisfied is payable in the course of administration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

(a) An attachment lien may be converted into a judgment lien on property in the estate subject to the attachment lien, with the same priority as the attachment lien, in either of the following cases:

(1) Where the judgment debtor dies after entry of judgment in an action in which the property was attached.

(2) Where a judgment is entered after the death of the defendant in an action in which the property was attached.

(b) To convert the attachment lien into a judgment lien, the levying officer shall, after entry of judgment in the action in which the property was attached and before the expiration of the attachment lien, do one of the following:

(1) Serve an abstract of the judgment, and a notice that the attachment lien has become a judgment lien, on the person holding property subject to the attachment lien.

(2) Record or file, in any office where the writ of attachment and notice of attachment are recorded or filed, an abstract of the judgment and a notice that the attachment lien has become a judgment lien. If the attached property is real property, the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney may record the required abstract and notice with the same effect as if recorded by the levying officer.

(c) After the death of the decedent, any members of the decedent’s family who were supported in whole or in part by the decedent may claim an exemption provided in Section 487.020 of the Code of Civil Procedure for property levied on under the writ of attachment if the right to the exemption exists at the time the exemption is claimed. The personal representative may claim the exemption on behalf of members of the decedent’s family. The claim of exemption may be made at any time before the time the abstract and notice are served, recorded, or filed under subdivision (b) with respect to the property claimed to be exempt. The claim of exemption shall be made in the same manner as an exemption is claimed under Section 482.100 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Claims in Litigation [9350. - 9399.]



  ARTICLE 1. Claim Where No Pending Action or Proceeding [9350. - 9354.]

9350.

This article applies to any claim other than a claim on an action or proceeding pending against the decedent at the time of death.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9351.

An action may not be commenced against a decedent’s personal representative on a cause of action against the decedent unless a claim is first filed as provided in this part and the claim is rejected in whole or in part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

(a) The filing of a claim or a petition under Section 9103 to file a claim tolls the statute of limitations otherwise applicable to the claim until allowance, approval, or rejection. 

(b) The allowance or approval of a claim in whole or in part further tolls the statute of limitations during the administration of the estate as to the part allowed or approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

9353.

(a) Regardless of whether the statute of limitations otherwise applicable to a claim will expire before or after the following times, a claim rejected in whole or in part is barred as to the part rejected unless, within the following times, the creditor commences an action on the claim or the matter is referred to a referee or to arbitration:

(1) If the claim is due at the time the notice of rejection is given, 90 days after the notice is given.

(2) If the claim is not due at the time the notice of rejection is given, 90 days after the claim becomes due.

(b) The time during which there is a vacancy in the office of the personal representative shall be excluded from the period determined under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 159, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9354.

(a) In addition to any other county in which an action may be commenced, an action on the claim may be commenced in the county in which the proceeding for administration of the decedent’s estate is pending.

(b) The plaintiff shall file a notice of the pendency of the action with the court clerk in the estate proceeding, together with proof of giving a copy of the notice to the personal representative as provided in Section 1215. Personal service of a copy of the summons and complaint on the personal representative is equivalent to the filing and giving of the notice. Any property distributed under court order, or any payment properly made, before the notice is filed and given is not subject to the claim. The personal representative, distributee, or payee is not liable on account of the prior distribution or payment.

(c) The prevailing party in the action shall be awarded court costs and, if the court determines that the prosecution or defense of the action against the prevailing party was unreasonable, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable litigation expenses, including attorney’s fees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Claim Where Action or Proceeding Pending [9370. - 9370.]

9370.

(a) An action or proceeding pending against the decedent at the time of death may not be continued against the decedent’s personal representative unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) A claim is first filed as provided in this part.

(2) The claim is rejected in whole or in part.

(3) Within three months after the notice of rejection is given, the plaintiff applies to the court in which the action or proceeding is pending for an order to substitute the personal representative in the action or proceeding. This paragraph applies only if the notice of rejection contains a statement that the plaintiff has three months within which to apply for an order for substitution.

(b) No recovery shall be allowed in the action against property in the decedent’s estate unless proof is made of compliance with this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Litigation Where No Claim Required [9390. - 9392.]

9390.

(a) An action to establish the decedent’s liability for which the decedent was protected by insurance may be commenced or continued under Section 550, and a judgment in the action may be enforced against the insurer, without first filing a claim as provided in this part.

(b) Unless a claim is first made as provided in this part, an action to establish the decedent’s liability for damages outside the limits or coverage of the insurance may not be commenced or continued under Section 550.

(c) If the insurer seeks reimbursement under the insurance contract for any liability of the decedent, including, but not limited to, deductible amounts in the insurance coverage and costs and attorney’s fees for which the decedent is liable under the contract, an insurer defending an action under Section 550 shall file a claim as provided in this part. Failure to file a claim is a waiver of reimbursement under the insurance contract for any liability of the decedent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 23.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

9391.

Except as provided in Section 10361, the holder of a mortgage or other lien on property in the decedent’s estate, including, but not limited to, a judgment lien, may commence an action to enforce the lien against the property that is subject to the lien, without first filing a claim as provided in this part, if in the complaint the holder of the lien expressly waives all recourse against other property in the estate. Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply to an action under this section. The personal representative shall have the authority to seek to enjoin any action of the lienholder to enforce a lien against property that is subject to the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9392.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a person to whom property is distributed is personally liable for the claim of a creditor, without a claim first having been filed, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The identity of the creditor was known to, or reasonably ascertainable by, a general personal representative within four months after the date letters were first issued to the personal representative, and the claim of the creditor was not merely conjectural.

(2) Notice of administration of the estate was not given to the creditor under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9050) and neither the creditor nor the attorney representing the creditor in the matter had actual knowledge of the administration of the estate before the time the court made an order for final distribution of the property.

(3) The statute of limitations applicable to the claim under Section 353 of the Code of Civil Procedure has not expired at the time of commencement of an action under this section.

(b) Personal liability under this section is applicable only to the extent the claim of the creditor cannot be satisfied out of the decedent and is limited to the extent of the fair market value of the property on the date of the order for distribution, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the property at that time. Personal liability under this section is joint and several, based on the principles stated in Part 4 (commencing with Section 21400) of Division 11 (abatement).

(c) Nothing in this section affects the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer of property in good faith and for value from a person who is personally liable under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 20.   See prevailing Section 9392 (added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 140) as amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

9392.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a person to whom property is distributed is personally liable for the claim of a creditor, without a claim first having been filed, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The identity of the creditor was known to, or reasonably ascertainable by, a general personal representative within four months after the date letters were first issued to the personal representative, and the claim of the creditor was not merely conjectural.

(2) Notice of administration of the estate was not given to the creditor under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9050) and neither the creditor nor the attorney representing the creditor in the matter has actual knowledge of the administration of the estate before the time the court made an order for final distribution of the property.

(3) The statute of limitations applicable to the claim under Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure has not expired at the time of commencement of an action under this section.

(b) Personal liability under this section is applicable only to the extent the claim of the creditor cannot be satisfied out of the estate of the decedent and is limited to a pro rata portion of the claim of the creditor, based on the proportion that the value of the property distributed to the person out of the estate bears to the total value of all property distributed to all persons out of the estate. Personal liability under this section for all claims of all creditors shall not exceed the value of the property distributed to the person out of the estate. As used in this section, the value of property is the fair market value of the property on the date of the order for distribution, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the property at that time.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer of property in good faith and for value from a person who is personally liable under this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 140) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transitional Provision [9399. - 9399.]

9399.

(a) This chapter does not apply to an action commenced before July 1, 1989.

(b) The applicable law in effect before July 1, 1989, continues to apply to an action commenced before July 1, 1989, notwithstanding its repeal by Chapter 1199 of the Statutes of 1988.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. ESTATE MANAGEMENT [9600. - 10382.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [9600. - 9645.]



  ARTICLE 1. Duties and Liabilities of Personal Representative [9600. - 9606.]

9600.

(a) The personal representative has the management and control of the estate and, in managing and controlling the estate, shall use ordinary care and diligence. What constitutes ordinary care and diligence is determined by all the circumstances of the particular estate.

(b) The personal representative:

(1) Shall exercise a power to the extent that ordinary care and diligence require that the power be exercised.

(2) Shall not exercise a power to the extent that ordinary care and diligence require that the power not be exercised.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9601.

(a) If a personal representative breaches a fiduciary duty, the personal representative is chargeable with any of the following that is appropriate under the circumstances:

(1) Any loss or depreciation in value of the decedent’s estate resulting from the breach of duty, with interest.

(2) Any profit made by the personal representative through the breach of duty, with interest.

(3) Any profit that would have accrued to the decedent’s estate if the loss of profit is the result of the breach of duty.

(b) If the personal representative has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the personal representative, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the personal representative in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9602.

(a) If the personal representative is liable for interest pursuant to Section 9601, the personal representative is liable for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of interest that accrues at the legal rate on judgments.

(2) The amount of interest actually received.

(b) If the personal representative has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the personal representative, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the personal representative in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 77, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9603.

The provisions of Sections 9601 and 9602 for liability of a personal representative for breach of a fiduciary duty do not prevent resort to any other remedy available against the personal representative under the statutory or common law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9604.

No personal representative is chargeable upon a special promise to answer in damages for a liability of the decedent or to pay a debt of the decedent out of the personal representative’s own estate unless the agreement for that purpose, or some memorandum or note thereof, is in writing and is signed by one of the following:

(a) The personal representative.

(b) Some other person specifically authorized by the personal representative in writing to sign the agreement or the memorandum or note.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9605.

Appointment of a person as personal representative does not discharge any claim the decedent has against the person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9606.

Unless otherwise provided in the instrument or in this division, a personal representative is not personally liable on an instrument, including but not limited to a note, mortgage, deed of trust, or other contract, properly entered into in the personal representative’s fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless the personal representative fails to reveal the personal representative’s representative capacity or identify the estate in the instrument.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Court Supervision [9610. - 9614.]

9610.

Unless this part specifically provides a proceeding to obtain court authorization or requires court authorization, the powers and duties set forth in this part may be exercised by the personal representative without court authorization, instruction, approval, or confirmation. Nothing in this section precludes the personal representative from seeking court authorization, instructions, approval, or confirmation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9611.

(a) In all cases where no other procedure is provided by statute, upon petition of the personal representative, the court may authorize and instruct the personal representative, or approve and confirm the acts of the personal representative, in the administration, management, investment, disposition, care, protection, operation, or preservation of the estate, or the incurring or payment of costs, fees, or expenses in connection therewith. Section 9613 does not preclude a petition for instructions under this section.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9613.

(a) On petition of any interested person, and upon a showing that if the petition is not granted the estate will suffer great or irreparable injury, the court may direct the personal representative to act or not to act concerning the estate. The order may include terms and conditions the court determines are appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9614.

(a) On petition of an interested person, the court may suspend the powers of the personal representative in whole or in part, for a time, as to specific property or circumstances or as to specific duties of the office, or may make any other order to secure proper performance of the duties of the personal representative, if it appears to the court that the personal representative otherwise may take some action that would jeopardize unreasonably the interest of the petitioner. Persons with whom the personal representative may transact business may be made parties.

(b) The matter shall be set for hearing within 10 days unless the parties agree otherwise. Notice as the court directs shall be given to the personal representative and attorney of record, if any, and to any other parties named in the petition.

(c) The court may, in its discretion, if it determines that the petition was brought unreasonably and for the purpose of hindering the personal representative in the performance of the duties of the office, assess attorney’s fees against the petitioner and make the assessment a charge against the interest of the petitioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Summary Determination of Disputes [9620. - 9621.]

9620.

If there is a dispute relating to the estate between the personal representative and a third person, the personal representative may do either of the following:

(a) Enter into an agreement in writing with the third person to refer the dispute to a temporary judge designated in the agreement. The agreement shall be filed with the clerk, who shall thereupon, with the approval of the court, enter an order referring the matter to the designated person. The temporary judge shall proceed promptly to hear and determine the matter in controversy by summary procedure, without pleadings or discovery. The decision of the designated person is subject to Section 632 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Judgment shall be entered on the decision and shall be as valid and effective as if rendered by a judge of the court in an action against the personal representative or the third person commenced by ordinary process.

(b) Enter into an agreement in writing with the third person that a judge, pursuant to the agreement and with the written consent of the judge, both filed with the clerk within the time specified in Section 9353 for bringing an independent suit on the matter in dispute, may hear and determine the dispute pursuant to the procedure provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9621.

If there is a dispute relating to the estate between the personal representative and a third person, the personal representative may enter into an agreement in writing with the third person to submit the dispute to arbitration under Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The agreement is not effective unless it is first approved by the court and a copy of the approved agreement is filed with the court. Notice of the hearing on the petition for approval of the agreement shall be given as provided in Section 1220. The order approving the agreement may be made ex parte.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Joint Personal Representatives [9630. - 9631.]

9630.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d):

(1) Where there are two personal representatives, both must concur to exercise a power.

(2) Where there are more than two personal representatives, a majority must concur to exercise a power.

(b) If one of the joint personal representatives dies or is removed or resigns, the powers and duties continue in the remaining joint personal representatives as if they were the only personal representatives until further appointment is made by the court.

(c) Where joint personal representatives have been appointed and one or more are (1) absent from the state and unable to act, or (2) otherwise unable to act, or (3) legally disqualified from serving, the court may, by order made with or without notice, authorize the remaining joint personal representatives to act as to all matters embraced within its order.

(d) Where there are two or more personal representatives, any of them may:

(1) Oppose a petition made by one or more of the other personal representatives or by any other person.

(2) Petition the court for an order requiring the personal representatives to take a specific action for the benefit of the estate or directing the personal representatives not to take a specific action. If a procedure is provided by statute for a petition to authorize the specific action by the personal representatives, the petitioner shall file the petition under the provision relating to that procedure. Otherwise, the petitioner shall file the petition under Section 9611.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9631.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), where there is more than one personal representative, one personal representative is not liable for a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another of the personal representatives.
